Utah statutes.
57-12-8.   Advisory program.
(1) Whenever the acquisition of real property for a program or project
undertaken by an agency will result in the displacement of any person after
the effective date of this act, the agency shall provide a relocation
assistance advisory program for displaced persons which shall offer the
services prescribed in this act. If the agency determines that any person
occupying property immediately adjacent to the real property acquired is
caused substantial economic injury because of the acquisition, it may offer
this person relocation advisory services under such program.
(2)  Each relocation assistance program required by Subsection (1) shall
include such measures, facilities, or services as may be necessary or
appropriate in order:
(a)  to determine the needs of displaced persons, business concerns, and
nonprofit organizations for relocation assistance;
(b)  to assist owners of displaced businesses and farm operations in obtaining
and becoming established in suitable business locations or replacement farms;
(c)  to supply information concerning programs of the federal, state, and
local governments offering assistance to displaced persons and business
concerns;
(d)  to assist in minimizing hardships to displaced persons in adjusting to
relocation; and
(e)  to secure, to the greatest extent practicable, the coordination of
relocation activities with other project activities and other planned or
proposed governmental actions in the community or nearby areas which may
affect the carrying out of the relocation program.
